Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-703.01
Department of Health and Human Services; federal funds; expenditures; authorized.

The Department of Health and Human Services has the authority to use any funds which may be made available through an agency of the government of the United States to reimburse any county of this state, either in whole or in part, for the following expenditures: (1) Employment of staff whose duties involve the giving or strengthening of services to children, (2) the return of any nonresident child to his or her place of residence when such child shall be found in the county, and (3) the temporary cost of board and care of a needy child who by necessity requires care in a foster home.

Laws 1959, c. 312, § 1, p. 1152;

Laws 1961, c. 415, § 16, p. 1254;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 298;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 242.